Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-322
Dissolution; certificate required; filing; fees.

In case of dissolution of
a corporation by action of a competent court, or the winding up
of a corporation, either foreign or domestic, by proceedings in assignment
or bankruptcy, a certificate shall be signed by the clerk of the court in
which such proceedings were had and filed in the office of the Secretary of
State. The fees for making and filing such certificate shall be taxed as costs
in the proceedings and paid out of the funds of the corporation and shall have the same
priority as other costs.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 22, p. 752;

R.S.1913, § 782;

C.S.1922, § 700;

C.S.1929, § 24-1722;

Laws 1943, c. 54, § 2, p. 218;

R.S.1943, § 21-322;

Laws 1967, c. 101, § 11, p. 315;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 252.
January 1, 2016